District of Columbia statutes.
7-1671.12

Public and private insurance.

Nothing in this chapter shall require a governmental, private, or any other health insurance provider or health care service plan to be liable for any claim for reimbursement for the use of medical marijuana.

Feb. 25, 2010, D.C. Law 13-315, § 13
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-210, § 2, 57 DCR 4798

History